Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Injunctions

§§ 4441-4446.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 4447.
Damages on final judgment.

When an injunction has been dissolved by a final judgment in favor of the enjoined party, he or she shall be entitled to recover his or her actual damages caused by the wrongful issuing of the injunction.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 120, eff. March 29, 1972.